Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1691.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.002, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Words, terms, and phrases. Unless the language or context clearly indicates that a different meaning is intended, deleted text begin the following words, terms, and phrases,deleted text end for the purposes of this chapter, deleted text begin shall be given the meanings subjoined to themdeleted text end new text begin the terms defined in this section have the meanings givennew text end . Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.002, subdivision 10, is amended to read: Subd. 10. First year of life. "First year of life" means the year of model designation of the vehicle, ordeleted text begin ,deleted text end if there deleted text begin bedeleted text end new text begin isnew text end no year of model designation, deleted text begin it shall meandeleted text end new text begin first year of life meansnew text end the year of manufacture.